src/fst/morphology/compounding.lexc
LEXICON R
 +Cmp#:# nouns ; ! NounRoot 
 +Cmp#:# N_NEWWORDS ; ! NounRoot 
 +Cmp/Hyph#:#- PROP_NEWWORDS ;


LEXICON RHyph
 +Cmp/Hyph#:0#- nouns ; ! evt restricting to NounRoot ;
 +Cmp/Hyph#:0#- N_NEWWORDS ; ! evt restricting to NounRoot ;
 +Cmp/Hyph#:0#- PROP_NEWWORDS ;

LEXICON RNum
      +Use/Circ+Cmp/Hyph#:%-# nouns ; ! evt restricting to NounRoot ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num 



!LEXICON ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM
!!2015-05-12!@D.NeedNoun.ON@ ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
! ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;

!LEXICON ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED
!!2015-05-12!+Use/Circ+Cmp#@P.NeedNoun.ON@:00#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ nouns ;
!+Use/Circ+Cmp#:# nouns ;
